Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 4. License Requirements

§ 33-29-401.
Professional license required.

Except as provided in this act, no individual shall engage in the practice of professional engineering or professional land surveying unless the individual holds the appropriate license issued by the board.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-29-201(a)(xii)

§ 33-29-402.
Requirements for intern certificate.

An applicant for a certificate as an engineer intern shall submit evidence satisfactory to the board showing that the applicant:

Is possessed of a background that does not evidence conduct adverse to the practice of engineering or to the ability to practice as an engineer intern;

Has graduated from a curriculum approved by the board of at least four (4) years; and

Has passed an examination in the fundamentals of engineering.

An applicant for a certificate as a land surveyor intern shall submit evidence satisfactory to the board showing that the applicant:

Is possessed of a background that does not evidence conduct adverse to the practice of land surveying or to the ability to practice as a land surveyor intern;

Has passed an examination in the fundamentals of land surveying;

Has one (1) of the following educational/experience backgrounds:

Has graduated from a curriculum approved by the board of at least four (4) years that contains at least thirty (30) semester credit hours in surveying approved by the board; or

Has graduated from a curriculum approved by the board of at least two (2) years that contains at least thirty (30) semester credit hours in surveying approved by the board plus two (2) years of combined office and field experience in land surveying, of which one (1) year shall have been in charge of land surveying projects under the supervision of a licensed professional land surveyor.

An engineer intern or land surveyor intern shall not practice as a professional engineer or a professional land surveyor.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, rewrote (a)(i) and (b)(i), both of which read: “Is of good moral character and repute.”

§ 33-29-403.
Requirements for professional license.

An applicant for a license as a professional engineer who has not graduated from a doctoral curriculum in engineering approved by the board shall submit evidence satisfactory to the board showing that the applicant:

Is possessed of a background that does not evidence conduct adverse to the practice of engineering or to the ability to practice engineering;

Has passed an examination in the principles and practice of engineering; and

Has one (1) of the following:

Has met the requirements for an engineer intern certificate and has four (4) years of engineering experience in increasing responsibility and scope of a grade and character that evidence the applicant is competent to practice as a professional engineer;or

Has graduated from a curriculum approved by the board of at least four (4) years and has been actively engaged in engineering practice of a character satisfactory to the board for at least ten (10) years after graduation.

An applicant for a license as a professional engineer who has graduated from a doctoral curriculum in engineering approved by the board shall submit evidence satisfactory to the board showing that the applicant:

Is possessed of a background that does not evidence conduct adverse to the practice of engineering or to the ability to practice engineering;

Has passed any examinations required by rule of the board to establish competence at a professional level in Wyoming licensing laws and professional ethics; and

Has four (4) years of engineering experience in increasing responsibility and scope of a grade and character that evidence the applicant is competent to practice as a professional engineer.

An applicant for a license as a professional land surveyor shall submit evidence satisfactory to the board showing that the applicant:

Is possessed of a background that does not evidence conduct adverse to the practice of land surveying or to the ability to practice land surveying;

Has passed the examination in the principles and practice of land surveying;

Has met the requirements for a land surveyor intern certificate; and

Has four (4) years of land surveying experience in increasing responsibility and scope of a grade and character that evidence the applicant is competent to practice as a professional land surveyor. This experience shall be in addition to that described in W.S. 33-29-402(b)(iii).

The board may by rule and regulation modify the requirements of this section as they relate to the licensure of a member of the faculty of the University of Wyoming teaching upper division engineering or land surveying courses.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(iii), added “one (1) of the following”, and added (a)(iii)(A) and (a)(iii)(B).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, rewrote (a)(i), (b)(i), and (c)(i), all of which read: “Is of good moral character and repute.”

Editor's note. —

Laws 2017, ch. 76, § 2, states: “This act shall apply to applications filed with the Wyoming board of professional engineers and professional land surveyors on or after the effective date of this act.”

§ 33-29-404.
Application for license.

An applicant for a license or certificate under this act shall submit an application on a form and in the manner prescribed by the board.

In addition to information required by the board, the application shall contain a statement under oath of the applicant’s education and engineering or land surveying work experience.

The board may accept an applicant’s records from the national council of examiners for engineering and surveying or its successor organization as a substitute for the information required in this act.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-29-201(a)(xii)

§ 33-29-405.
Fees.

The board shall establish fees in accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

as necessary to provide for the administration of this act, including license and certificate application fees and fees for services provided by the board. Application fees shall accompany the application. Application fees are nonrefundable.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-29-201(a)(xii)

§ 33-29-406.
License on the basis of comity.

An applicant who holds a license issued by another jurisdiction to practice professional engineering or professional land surveying may be issued a professional license provided:

The applicant has submitted evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant has a background that does not evidence conduct adverse to the practice of engineering or land surveying or to the ability to practice engineering or land surveying;

The applicant has passed any examinations required by rule of the board to establish competence at a professional level in Wyoming licensing laws and professional ethics; and

The applicant:

Meets the education, experience and examination requirements equivalent to the requirements in effect in Wyoming at the time the applicant’s license was issued by the other jurisdiction; or

Meets requirements established by the national council of examiners for engineering and surveying or its successor organization that the board has determined are equivalent to the requirements for a professional license in Wyoming.

An applicant who holds a license issued by another jurisdiction to practice professional engineering or professional land surveying, and who has held the license for fifteen (15) years immediately prior to submitting the application, may be issued a professional license provided the applicant:

Is possessed of a background that does not evidence conduct adverse to the practice of engineering or land surveying or to the ability to practice engineering or land surveying; and

Has passed any examination required by rule of the board to establish competence at a professional level in Wyoming licensing laws and professional ethics.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(i), substituted “submitted evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is of good moral character and repute” for “not been disciplined by another jurisdiction”; and in (b)(i), substituted “Is of good moral character and repute” for “Has not been disciplined in any jurisdiction.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(i), substituted “has a background that does not evidence conduct adverse to the practice of engineering or land surveying or to the ability to practice engineering or land surveying” for “is of good moral character and repute” following “the applicant”; and rewrote (b)(i), which read “Is of good moral character and repute.”